Washington statutes.
RCW 19.120.130

Exception or exemption—Burden of proof—Waiver of provisions of chapter void.

In any proceeding under this chapter, the burden of proving an exception or an exemption from definition is upon the person claiming it. Any condition, stipulation or provision purporting to bind any person acquiring a motor fuel franchise at the time of entering into a motor fuel franchise or other agreement to waive compliance with any provision of this chapter or any rule or order hereunder is void.

[ 1986 c 320 s 14.]